District of Columbia statutes.
29-1012.04

Voluntary dissolution before commencement of activity.

A majority of the organizers or initial directors of a limited cooperative association that has not yet begun business activity or the conduct of its affairs may dissolve the association.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-1012.02 and § 29-1012.05.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1204 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.